Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6089YC (1) 91 ms/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 29C.17, subsection 2, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 For purposes consistent with this chapter , the local 3 emergency management agencyâs approved budget shall be 4 funded by one or any combination of the following options, 5 as determined by the commission , except as provided in this 6 subsection : 7 Sec. 2. Section 29C.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. A countywide special levy pursuant to section 331.424, 10 subsection 1 , which must be approved by the board of 11 supervisors . 12 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to local emergency 13 management agency budgets for fiscal years beginning on or 14 after July 1, 2027. 15